Washington statutes.
RCW 8.08.060

Judgment—Decree of appropriation.

Upon the verdict of the jury or upon the determination of the court of the compensation or damages to be paid for the real estate or property appropriated, judgment shall be entered against such county in favor of the owner or owners of the real estate or property so appropriated for the amount found as just compensation therefor, and upon the payment of such amount by such county to the clerk of such court for the use of the owner or owners or the persons interested in the premises sought to be taken, the court shall enter a decree of appropriation of the real estate or property sought to be taken, thereby vesting the title to the same in such county; and a certified copy of such decree of appropriation may be filed in the office of the county auditor of the county wherein the real estate taken is situated and shall be recorded by such auditor like a deed of real estate and with like effect. The money so paid to the clerk of the court shall be by him or her paid to the person or persons entitled thereto upon the order of the court.

[ 2011 c 336 s 258; 1949 c 79 s 6; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 3991-11.]